Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-127
United States Experiment Station Fund; source; use.

The United States Experiment Station Fund shall consist of (1) all money which may come into the possession of the State Treasurer on and after July 1, 1899, accruing under an Act of Congress approved March 2, 1887, entitled An act to establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the colleges established in the several states under the provisions of an act approved July 2, 1862, and the acts supplemental thereto, and (2) all money which may hereafter be received by virtue of any Act of Congress supplemental to the agricultural experiment station act and for the same purposes. The fund is hereby appropriated to be applied exclusively to the uses and objects designated by the Act or Acts of Congress relating thereto and shall at all times be subject to the orders of the Board of Regents for expenditure for such uses only.

Laws 1869, § 21, p. 177;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 57;

Laws 1899, c. 76, § 1, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7105;

C.S.1922, § 6737;

C.S.1929, § 85-123;

R.S.1943, § 85-127;

Laws 1987, LB 25, § 1.

Board of Regents may disburse fund without special appropriation. State ex rel. Spencer Lens Co. v. Searle, 77 Neb. 155, 109 N.W. 770 (1906).